lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
SFX 11304 Y 2
SFX 11304 ušti ušti/465 . 336
SFX 11304 uštis uštis/465 . 336

SFX 11305 Y 2
SFX 11305 ušti ušti/466 . 336
SFX 11305 uštis uštis/466 . 336

SFX 11306 Y 2
SFX 11306 ušti ušti/467 . 336
SFX 11306 uštis uštis/467 . 336

SFX 11307 Y 2
SFX 11307 ušti ušti/468 . 336
SFX 11307 uštis uštis/468 . 336

SFX 11308 Y 2
SFX 11308 ušti ušti/469 . 336
SFX 11308 uštis uštis/469 . 336

SFX 11309 Y 2
SFX 11309 ušti ušti/470 . 336
SFX 11309 uštis uštis/470 . 336

SFX 11310 Y 2
SFX 11310 ušti ušti/471 . 336
SFX 11310 uštis uštis/471 . 336

SFX 11311 Y 2
SFX 11311 ušti ušti/472 . 336
SFX 11311 uštis uštis/472 . 336

SFX 11312 Y 2
SFX 11312 ušti ušti/473 . 336
SFX 11312 uštis uštis/473 . 336

SFX 11323 Y 2
SFX 11323 ušti ūšta/474 . 337
SFX 11323 uštis ūštasi/474 . 337

SFX 11324 Y 2
SFX 11324 ušti ūšta/475 . 337
SFX 11324 uštis ūštasi/475 . 337

SFX 11325 Y 2
SFX 11325 ušti ūšta/476 . 337
SFX 11325 uštis ūštasi/476 . 337

SFX 11326 Y 2
SFX 11326 ušti ūšta/477 . 337
SFX 11326 uštis ūštasi/477 . 337

SFX 11327 Y 2
SFX 11327 ušti ūšta/478 . 337
SFX 11327 uštis ūštasi/478 . 337

SFX 11328 Y 2
SFX 11328 ušti ūšta/479 . 337
SFX 11328 uštis ūštasi/479 . 337

SFX 11329 Y 2
SFX 11329 ušti ūšta/480 . 337
SFX 11329 uštis ūštasi/480 . 337

SFX 11330 Y 2
SFX 11330 ušti ūšta/481 . 337
SFX 11330 uštis ūštasi/481 . 337

SFX 11331 Y 2
SFX 11331 ušti ūšta/482 . 337
SFX 11331 uštis ūštasi/482 . 337

SFX 11341 Y 1
SFX 11341 ušti ūštie/483 . 337

SFX 11342 Y 1
SFX 11342 uštis ūštie/484 . 337

SFX 11343 Y 2
SFX 11343 ušti ušo/485 . 338
SFX 11343 uštis ušosi/485 . 338

SFX 11344 Y 2
SFX 11344 ušti ušo/486 . 338
SFX 11344 uštis ušosi/486 . 338

SFX 11345 Y 2
SFX 11345 ušti ušo/487 . 338
SFX 11345 uštis ušosi/487 . 338

SFX 11349 Y 2
SFX 11349 uzti uzti/464 . 336
SFX 11349 uztis uztis/464 . 336

SFX 11350 Y 2
SFX 11350 uzti uzti/465 . 336
SFX 11350 uztis uztis/465 . 336

SFX 11351 Y 2
SFX 11351 uzti uzti/466 . 336
SFX 11351 uztis uztis/466 . 336

SFX 11352 Y 2
SFX 11352 uzti uzti/467 . 336
SFX 11352 uztis uztis/467 . 336

SFX 11353 Y 2
SFX 11353 uzti uzti/468 . 336
SFX 11353 uztis uztis/468 . 336

SFX 11354 Y 2
SFX 11354 uzti uzti/469 . 336
SFX 11354 uztis uztis/469 . 336

SFX 11355 Y 2
SFX 11355 uzti uzti/470 . 336
SFX 11355 uztis uztis/470 . 336

SFX 11356 Y 2
SFX 11356 uzti uzti/471 . 336
SFX 11356 uztis uztis/471 . 336

SFX 11357 Y 2
SFX 11357 uzti uzti/472 . 336
SFX 11357 uztis uztis/472 . 336

SFX 11358 Y 2
SFX 11358 uzti uzti/473 . 336
SFX 11358 uztis uztis/473 . 336

SFX 11369 Y 2
SFX 11369 uzti ūzda/474 . 337
SFX 11369 uztis ūzdasi/474 . 337

SFX 11370 Y 2
SFX 11370 uzti ūzda/475 . 337
SFX 11370 uztis ūzdasi/475 . 337

SFX 11371 Y 2
SFX 11371 uzti ūzda/476 . 337
SFX 11371 uztis ūzdasi/476 . 337

SFX 11372 Y 2
SFX 11372 uzti ūzda/477 . 337
SFX 11372 uztis ūzdasi/477 . 337

SFX 11373 Y 2
SFX 11373 uzti ūzda/478 . 337
SFX 11373 uztis ūzdasi/478 . 337

SFX 11374 Y 2
SFX 11374 uzti ūzda/479 . 337
SFX 11374 uztis ūzdasi/479 . 337

SFX 11375 Y 2
SFX 11375 uzti ūzda/480 . 337
SFX 11375 uztis ūzdasi/480 . 337

SFX 11376 Y 2
SFX 11376 uzti ūzda/481 . 337
SFX 11376 uztis ūzdasi/481 . 337

SFX 11377 Y 2
SFX 11377 uzti ūzda/482 . 337
SFX 11377 uztis ūzdasi/482 . 337

SFX 11387 Y 1
SFX 11387 uzti ūzdie/483 . 337

SFX 11388 Y 1
SFX 11388 uztis ūzdie/484 . 337

SFX 11389 Y 2
SFX 11389 uzti uzdo/485 . 338
SFX 11389 uztis uzdosi/485 . 338

SFX 11390 Y 2
SFX 11390 uzti uzdo/486 . 338
SFX 11390 uztis uzdosi/486 . 338

SFX 11391 Y 2
SFX 11391 uzti uzdo/487 . 338
SFX 11391 uztis uzdosi/487 . 338

SFX 11395 Y 2
SFX 11395 auti auti/464 . 336
SFX 11395 autis autis/464 . 336

SFX 11396 Y 2
SFX 11396 auti auti/465 . 336
SFX 11396 autis autis/465 . 336

SFX 11397 Y 2
SFX 11397 auti auti/466 . 336
SFX 11397 autis autis/466 . 336

SFX 11398 Y 2
SFX 11398 auti auti/467 . 336
SFX 11398 autis autis/467 . 336

SFX 11399 Y 2
SFX 11399 auti auti/468 . 336
SFX 11399 autis autis/468 . 336

SFX 11400 Y 2
SFX 11400 auti auti/469 . 336
SFX 11400 autis autis/469 . 336

SFX 11401 Y 2
SFX 11401 auti auti/470 . 336
SFX 11401 autis autis/470 . 336

SFX 11402 Y 2
SFX 11402 auti auti/471 . 336
SFX 11402 autis autis/471 . 336

SFX 11403 Y 2
SFX 11403 auti auti/472 . 336
SFX 11403 autis autis/472 . 336

SFX 11404 Y 2
SFX 11404 auti auti/473 . 336
SFX 11404 autis autis/473 . 336

SFX 11415 Y 2
SFX 11415 auti auja/474 . 337
SFX 11415 autis aujasi/474 . 337

SFX 11416 Y 2
SFX 11416 auti auja/475 . 337
SFX 11416 autis aujasi/475 . 337

SFX 11417 Y 2
SFX 11417 auti auja/476 . 337
SFX 11417 autis aujasi/476 . 337

SFX 11418 Y 2
SFX 11418 auti auja/477 . 337
SFX 11418 autis aujasi/477 . 337

SFX 11419 Y 2
SFX 11419 auti auja/478 . 337
SFX 11419 autis aujasi/478 . 337

SFX 11420 Y 2
SFX 11420 auti auja/479 . 337
SFX 11420 autis aujasi/479 . 337

SFX 11421 Y 2
SFX 11421 auti auja/480 . 337
SFX 11421 autis aujasi/480 . 337

SFX 11422 Y 2
SFX 11422 auti auja/481 . 337
SFX 11422 autis aujasi/481 . 337

SFX 11423 Y 2
SFX 11423 auti auja/482 . 337
SFX 11423 autis aujasi/482 . 337

SFX 11433 Y 1
SFX 11433 auti aujie/483 . 337

SFX 11434 Y 1
SFX 11434 autis aujie/484 . 337

SFX 11435 Y 2
SFX 11435 auti ovė/485 . 338
SFX 11435 autis ovėsi/485 . 338

SFX 11436 Y 2
SFX 11436 auti ovė/486 . 338
SFX 11436 autis ovėsi/486 . 338

SFX 11437 Y 2
SFX 11437 auti ovė/487 . 338
SFX 11437 autis ovėsi/487 . 338

SFX 11441 Y 2
SFX 11441 ąsti ąsti/464 . 336
SFX 11441 ąstis ąstis/464 . 336

SFX 11442 Y 2
SFX 11442 ąsti ąsti/465 . 336
SFX 11442 ąstis ąstis/465 . 336

SFX 11443 Y 2
SFX 11443 ąsti ąsti/466 . 336
SFX 11443 ąstis ąstis/466 . 336

SFX 11444 Y 2
SFX 11444 ąsti ąsti/467 . 336
SFX 11444 ąstis ąstis/467 . 336

SFX 11445 Y 2
SFX 11445 ąsti ąsti/468 . 336
SFX 11445 ąstis ąstis/468 . 336

SFX 11446 Y 2
SFX 11446 ąsti ąsti/469 . 336
SFX 11446 ąstis ąstis/469 . 336

SFX 11447 Y 2
SFX 11447 ąsti ąsti/470 . 336
SFX 11447 ąstis ąstis/470 . 336

SFX 11448 Y 2
SFX 11448 ąsti ąsti/471 . 336
SFX 11448 ąstis ąstis/471 . 336

SFX 11449 Y 2
SFX 11449 ąsti ąsti/472 . 336
SFX 11449 ąstis ąstis/472 . 336

SFX 11450 Y 2
SFX 11450 ąsti ąsti/473 . 336
SFX 11450 ąstis ąstis/473 . 336

SFX 11461 Y 2
SFX 11461 ąsti ąsta/474 . 337
SFX 11461 ąstis ąstasi/474 . 337

SFX 11462 Y 2
SFX 11462 ąsti ąsta/475 . 337
SFX 11462 ąstis ąstasi/475 . 337

SFX 11463 Y 2
SFX 11463 ąsti ąsta/476 . 337
SFX 11463 ąstis ąstasi/476 . 337

SFX 11464 Y 2
SFX 11464 ąsti ąsta/477 . 337
SFX 11464 ąstis ąstasi/477 . 337

SFX 11465 Y 2
SFX 11465 ąsti ąsta/478 . 337
SFX 11465 ąstis ąstasi/478 . 337

SFX 11466 Y 2
SFX 11466 ąsti ąsta/479 . 337
SFX 11466 ąstis ąstasi/479 . 337

SFX 11467 Y 2
SFX 11467 ąsti ąsta/480 . 337
SFX 11467 ąstis ąstasi/480 . 337

SFX 11468 Y 2
SFX 11468 ąsti ąsta/481 . 337
SFX 11468 ąstis ąstasi/481 . 337

SFX 11469 Y 2
SFX 11469 ąsti ąsta/482 . 337
SFX 11469 ąstis ąstasi/482 . 337

SFX 11479 Y 1
SFX 11479 ąsti ąstie/483 . 337

SFX 11480 Y 1
SFX 11480 ąstis ąstie/484 . 337

SFX 11481 Y 2
SFX 11481 ąsti ando/485 . 338
SFX 11481 ąstis andosi/485 . 338

SFX 11482 Y 2
SFX 11482 ąsti ando/486 . 338
SFX 11482 ąstis andosi/486 . 338

SFX 11483 Y 2
SFX 11483 ąsti ando/487 . 338
SFX 11483 ąstis andosi/487 . 338

SFX 11487 Y 2
SFX 11487 erti erti/464 . 336
SFX 11487 ertis ertis/464 . 336

SFX 11488 Y 2
SFX 11488 erti erti/465 . 336
SFX 11488 ertis ertis/465 . 336

SFX 11489 Y 2
SFX 11489 erti erti/466 . 336
SFX 11489 ertis ertis/466 . 336

SFX 11490 Y 2
SFX 11490 erti erti/467 . 336
SFX 11490 ertis ertis/467 . 336

SFX 11491 Y 2
SFX 11491 erti erti/468 . 336
SFX 11491 ertis ertis/468 . 336

SFX 11492 Y 2
SFX 11492 erti erti/469 . 336
SFX 11492 ertis ertis/469 . 336

SFX 11493 Y 2
SFX 11493 erti erti/470 . 336
SFX 11493 ertis ertis/470 . 336

SFX 11494 Y 2
SFX 11494 erti erti/471 . 336
SFX 11494 ertis ertis/471 . 336

SFX 11495 Y 2
SFX 11495 erti erti/472 . 336
SFX 11495 ertis ertis/472 . 336

SFX 11496 Y 2
SFX 11496 erti erti/473 . 336
SFX 11496 ertis ertis/473 . 336

AF 11441,11442,11461,11481,65521 # 175
AF 11303,11304,11323,11343,65521 # 205
AF 11487,11488,11507,11547,65521 # 312
AF 11395,11396,11415,11435,65521 # 389
AF 11349,11350,11369,11389,65521 # 423
