lt-LT_morphology.dic
apsigąsti/175	13
aptriušti/205	11
gverti/312	11
išgverti/312	11
išsigąsti/175	13
neaptriušti/205	33
nebeišsigąsti/175	34
neišsigąsti/175	34
nenusigąsti/175	34
nenutriušti/205	33
nepabizniauti/389	33
nepersigąsti/175	34
nesiniauti/389	34
niautis/389	13
nusigąsti/175	13
nutriušti/205	11
pabizniauti/389	11
patriušti/205	11
persigąsti/175	13
subruzti/423	11
susiniauti/389	13
sutriušti/205	11
tebesiniauti/389	13
teneišsigąsti/175	13
nenupušti/205	59
nupušti/205	57
